nb: Trommeklammerfestets grensesnitt mot stativ/tromme: Kuleleddmottaker; Galgearmmottaker; Cymbalvippefeste; Flat plate-feste; Trinnløst vippefeste; L-stangmottaker; Mottaker for flere stenger (dobbel); Stangmottaker (rett); Gjenget mottaker; Gjenget tapp; Annet
cs: Typ úchytu pro montáž bubnových ráfků: Kulový kloub; Držák ramenového stojanu; Držák s naklápěčem na činel; Plochý montážní prvek; Bezzubý naklápěcí držák; Držák pro L-tyč; Vícebodový držák (duální); Držák pro rovnou tyč; Závitový úchyt; Závitový kolík; Jiné
da: Monteringsoveflade til trommeklemme: Kugleledsmodtager; Galgearmsmodtager; Bækkentilterbeslag; Flad plademontering; Trinløst tilterbeslag; L-stangsmodtager; Multistativsmodtager (dobbelt); Stangmodtager (lige); Gevindmodtager; Gevindtap; Andet
pt-BR: Interface de montagem do grampo de tambor: Receptor esférico; Receptor de braço articulado (boom); Montagem de inclinação de prato; Montagem de placa plana; Montagem de inclinação sem engrenagens; Receptor de haste em L; Receptor multipostes (duplo); Receptor de haste (reto); Receptor roscado; Pino roscado; Outros
nl: Drumklem montage-interface: Kogelgewrichtontvanger; Hengelarmontvanger; Bekkentiltermontage; Platte plaatmontage; Tandloze tiltermontage; L-stangontvanger; Meervoudige ontvanger (dubbel); Stangontvanger (recht); Ontvanger met schroefdraad; Tapbout; Overige
bg-BG: Интерфейс за монтаж на скоба за барабан: Сферичен приемник; Приемник за рамо; Монтаж за наклон на чинел; Монтаж с плоска пластина; Безстепенен монтаж за наклон; Приемник за L-образен прът; Многоосов приемник (двоен); Приемник за прът (прав); Приемник с резба; Шпилка с резба; Друго
it: Interfaccia di montaggio a morsetto per tamburo: Connettore sferico; Connettore per asta a giraffa; Montaggio su tilter del piatto; Montaggio su piastra piana; Montaggio su tilter senza ingranaggi; Connettore per asta a L; Connettore multi-asta (doppio); Connettore per asta (dritto); Connettore filettato; Perno filettato; Altro
hu: Dobszorító rögzítőfelület: Gömbcsuklós foglalat; Gém foglalat; Cintányér dőlésszög-állító foglalat; Lapos lemezes foglalat; Fokozatmentes dőlésszög-állító foglalat; L-rúd foglalat; Többoszlopos foglalat (kettős); Rúd foglalat (egyenes); Menetes foglalat; Menetes csap; Egyéb
zh-CN: 鼓用夹具安装接口: 球窝连接器; 吊臂连接器; 镲片倾斜器支架; 平底板支架; 无齿倾斜器支架; L 型杆连接器; 多柱连接器（双柱）; 杆状连接器（直杆）; 螺纹连接器; 螺栓; 其他
vi: Giao diện kẹp trống: Khớp nối bi và ổ cắm; Khớp nối tay cần; Ngàm gắn độ nghiêng chũm chọe; Ngàm gắn đĩa phẳng; Ngàm gắn độ nghiêng không bánh răng; Khớp nối cần chữ L; Khớp nối nhiều trụ (kép); Khớp nối cần (thẳng); Khớp nối có ren; Đinh tán có ren; Khác
ja: ドラムクランプマウントインターフェース: ボール＆ソケットレシーバー; ブームアームレシーバー; シンバルティルターマウント; フラットプレートマウント; ギアレスティルターマウント; Lロッドレシーバー; マルチポストレシーバー (デュアル); ロッドレシーバー (ストレート); ネジ付きレシーバー; ネジ付きスタッド; その他
zh-TW: 鼓夾安裝介面: 球窩接頭接收器; 懸臂接收器; 鈸斜角支架; 平板支架; 無段斜角支架; L 型桿接收器; 多柱接收器 (雙柱); 桿式接收器 (直式); 螺紋接收器; 螺紋雙頭螺柱; 其他
hr-HR: Sučelje za montažu stezaljke bubnja: Prihvat s kuglastim zglobom; Prihvat za zglobnu ruku (boom arm); Nosač s nagibom za činelu; Nosač s ravnom pločom; Nosač s nagibom bez zupčanika; Prihvat za L-šipku; Prihvat za više šipki (dvostruki); Prihvat za šipku (ravni); Prihvat s navojem; Klin s navojem; Ostalo
fr: Interface de montage de la pince de tambour: Récepteur à rotule; Récepteur pour bras perche; Fixation d’inclinaison pour cymbale; Fixation sur plaque plate; Fixation d’inclinaison sans cran; Récepteur pour tige en L; Récepteur multiposte (double); Récepteur pour tige (droite); Récepteur fileté; Goujon fileté; Autre
sl-SI: Vmesnik za pritrditev objemke za boben: Sprejemnik s krogličnim zglobom; Sprejemnik za roko stojala (boom); Nosilec z nagibnim mehanizmom za činele; Nosilec za ravno ploščo; Nosilec z brezstopenjskim nagibnim mehanizmom; Sprejemnik z L-palico; Večstenski sprejemnik (dvojni); Sprejemnik za palico (ravni); Navojni sprejemnik; Navojni zatič; Drugo
tr: Davul kelepçesi montaj arayüzü: Bilyeli mafsal alıcısı; Bom kolu alıcısı; Zil eğici montaj parçası; Düz plaka montaj parçası; Dişlisiz eğici montaj parçası; L çubuk alıcısı; Çoklu direk alıcısı (çift); Çubuk alıcısı (düz); Dişli alıcı; Dişli saplama; Diğer
ro-RO: Interfață de montare a clemei pentru tobă: Receptor cu articulație sferică; Receptor pentru braț de macara; Suport înclinabil pentru cinel; Suport cu placă plană; Suport înclinabil fără dinți; Receptor tijă în L; Receptor cu mai multe tije (dublu); Receptor tijă (drept); Receptor filetat; Știft filetat; Altele
fi: Rumpupidikkeen kiinnitysliitäntä: Pallonivelkiinnitys; Puomivarren kiinnitys; Symbaalin kallistimen kiinnitys; Tasainen levykiinnitys; Portaaton kallistimen kiinnitys; L-tangon kiinnitys; Monipylväskiinnitys (kaksiosainen); Tangon kiinnitys (suora); Kierteitetty kiinnitys; Kierretappi; Muu
lt-LT: Būgno spaustuko montavimo sąsaja: Rutulinio šarnyro laikiklis; Gervės strėlės laikiklis; Lėkštės pakreipimo laikiklis; Plokščias tvirtinimas; Bepakopis pakreipimo laikiklis; L formos strypo laikiklis; Kelių atramų laikiklis (dvigubas); Strypo laikiklis (tiesus); Srieginis laikiklis; Srieginė smeigė; Kita
pt-PT: Interface de montagem com grampo de tambor: Recetor esférico e de encaixe; Recetor de braço articulado; Montagem de inclinação para pratos; Montagem em placa plana; Montagem de inclinação sem engrenagens; Recetor em haste L; Recetor com várias hastes (duplo); Recetor em haste (reto); Recetor roscado; Perno roscado; Outro
sk-SK: Montážne rozhranie svorky bubna: Guľový kĺbový úchyt; Úchyt pre rameno; Držiak sklonu činely; Plochý doskový držiak; Bezprevodový sklopný držiak; Úchyt pre L-tyč; Viacbodový úchyt (dvojitý); Úchyt pre tyč (rovný); Závitový úchyt; Závitový čap; Iné
ko: 드럼 클램프 마운트 인터페이스: 볼 앤 소켓 리시버; 붐 암 리시버; 심벌 틸터 마운트; 평판 마운트; 기어리스 틸터 마운트; L-로드 리시버; 멀티 포스트 리시버(듀얼); 로드 리시버(스트레이트); 스레드 리시버; 스레드 스터드; 기타
pl: Interfejs mocowania zacisku gręplarki bębnowej: Gniazdo kulowe; Gniazdo ramienia łamanego; Gniazdo statywu pod talerz; Mocowanie na płaskiej płycie; Gniazdo bezstopniowe; Gniazdo na pręt typu L; Gniazdo wielopunktowe (podwójne); Gniazdo na pręt (proste); Gniazdo gwintowane; Trzpień gwintowany; Inne
el: Διεπαφή στήριξης σφιγκτήρα τυμπάνου: Υποδοχή μπίλιας; Υποδοχή βραχίονα (boom); Βάση κλίσης πιατινιού; Βάση επίπεδης πλάκας; Βάση κλίσης χωρίς γρανάζια; Υποδοχή ράβδου σχήματος L; Υποδοχή πολλαπλών στηριγμάτων (διπλή); Υποδοχή ράβδου (ίσια); Υποδοχή με σπείρωμα; Πείρος με σπείρωμα; Άλλο
en: Drum clamp mount interface: Ball-and-socket receiver; Boom arm receiver; Cymbal tilter mount; Flat plate mount; Gearless tilter mount; L-rod receiver; Multi-post receiver (dual); Rod receiver (straight); Threaded receiver; Threaded stud; Other
sv: Gränssnitt för montering av trumklämma: Kulledsmottagare; Bomarmsmottagare; Cymbaltilter-fäste; Plattfäste; Kugghjulslöst tilterfäste; Mottagare för L-stång; Mottagare för flera stolpar (dubbel); Stångmottagare (rak); Gängad mottagare; Gängad tapp; Övrigt
th: ประเภทอินเทอร์เฟซตัวหนีบยึดกับกลอง: ตัวรับข้อต่อลูกหมาก; ตัวรับแขนบูม; แท่นยึดปรับองศาฉาบ; แท่นยึดเพลทแบน; แท่นยึดปรับองศาแบบไม่มีเฟือง; ตัวรับก้านแอล; ตัวรับหลายเสา (คู่); ตัวรับก้าน (ตรง); ตัวรับแบบเกลียว; สตัดเกลียว; อื่นๆ
es: Interfaz de montaje de abrazadera de tambor: Receptor de rótula; Receptor de brazo articulado; Soporte de inclinación para platillos; Soporte de placa plana; Soporte de inclinación sin engranajes; Receptor de varilla en L; Receptor multiposte (doble); Receptor de varilla (recto); Receptor roscado; Perno roscado; Otro
de: Montageschnittstelle der Trommelklemme: Kugelgelenk-Aufnahme; Galgenarm-Aufnahme; Becken-Neigehalterung; Flachplattenhalterung; Stufenlose Neigehalterung; L-Rod-Aufnahme; Multi-Post-Aufnahme (dual); Stangenaufnahme (gerade); Gewindeaufnahme; Gewindebolzen; Sonstige
ru: Интерфейс крепления барабанного зажима: Шаровое шарнирное крепление; Крепление для штанги; Наклонное крепление для тарелки; Плоское пластинчатое крепление; Беззубчатое наклонное крепление; Крепление для L-образного стержня; Многоштыревое крепление (двойное); Крепление для стержня (прямое); Резьбовое крепление; Резьбовая шпилька; Другое